District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.06

Reviews and reporting requirements.

(a)

(1)

The independent expert consultant shall:

(A)

Prepare, by June 1, 2015, and on a semiannual basis thereafter, a public report that contains:

(i)

A description of the work conducted by the independent expert consultant for that period;

(ii)

The methodology and specific findings for each review conducted, including a general description of the policies and procedures reviewed, the observations of the consultant regarding the MPD’s implementation of those policies and procedures, the training reviewed, and a discussion of any improvements that need to be made;

(iii)

A determination of whether the MPD’s implementation of reforms made after March 2013 are having a positive effect on the overall investigations of sexual assaults and whether there are any unintended negative consequences of these new policies or reforms;

(iv)

A comparison of cases reported to the MPD through the DC SANE Program and MPD case numbers to ensure that all sexual assaults have been documented; and

(v)

The Chief of Police’s formal response to the report prepared pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection; and

(B)

Review the case review plan and process developed pursuant to § 4-561.14(d)(1), making recommendations for improvement as needed.

(2)

(A)

A draft version of the report shall be provided to the Chief of Police for review before the public issuance of the final report.

(B)

The Chief of Police shall have 30 days to review the report and prepare a formal response for purposes of a public report issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(b)

(1)

The independent consultant shall, within 45 days of being retained by the OVS, develop a plan and a schedule for conducting the reviews and preparing the report described in subsection (a)(1) of this section, and shall submit this plan to the OVS for review and approval.

(2)

The plan established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include a timeline for submitting any recommendations to the Council or the Mayor regarding proposed legislation.

(c)

The OVS shall complete a review of the independent expert consultant’s plan developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section within 30 days from the date of receipt.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 206, 61 DCR 5913